New Jersey, session 221, S742.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any remaining unexpended funds from the New Jersey Bridge Rehabilitation and Improvement and Railroad Right-of-way Preservation Bond Act of 1989, P.L.1989, c.180, which were appropriated pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.271, shall be reappropriated to the Department of Transportation and made available for the purposes set forth in subsection b. of this section. b.    The funds reappropriated pursuant to this section shall be administered by the department to offset any cost, eligible under the provisions of P.L.1989, c.180, for the cost of rehabilitation, improvement, inspection, and repair of bridges carrying State highways, and bridges owned or maintained by the State, to be allocated for emergency repairs in various counties at the discretion of the Commissioner of Transportation. 2.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any remaining unexpended funds from the New Jersey Bridge Rehabilitation and Improvement and Railroad Right-of-way Preservation Bond Act of 1989, P.L.1989, c.180, which were appropriated pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1991, c.271 and section 2 of P.L.2000, c.11, shall be reappropriated to the Department of Transportation and made available for the purposes set forth in subsection b. of this section. b.    The funds reappropriated pursuant to this section shall be administered by the department to offset any cost, eligible under the provisions of P.L.1989, c.180, for the cost of rehabilitation, improvement, inspection, and repair of bridges carrying county and municipal roads, to be allocated for emergency repairs in various counties and municipalities at the discretion of the Commissioner of Transportation. c.     Any funds appropriated pursuant to the provisions of this section that are not expended or obligated within two years of the effective date of this act shall be consolidated into a single account and redistributed to each county in this State on a formula basis, to be established by the department, for the cost of rehabilitation, improvement, inspection, and repair of bridges carrying county and municipal roads. Funds that have not been obligated, but are required to complete a project under development, shall be subject to consolidation and redistribution. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.